Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3565.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin SULLIVAN LAKE DAM; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $500,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the environment and natural resources trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources to replace the Sullivan Lake Dam in Morrison County. new text end